Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.aff
FLAG num
SFX 826	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 826	0	rep/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 826	0	reba/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 826	0	rebam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 826	0	rebau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 826	0	reben/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 827	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 827	0	reba/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 827	0	rebes/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 827	0	rebam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 827	0	rebau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 827	0	reben/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 828	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 828	0	é	.		#hipotetic
SFX 828	0	às	.		#hipotetic
SFX 828	0	à	.		#hipotetic
SFX 828	0	em	.		#hipotetic
SFX 828	0	eu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 828	0	an	.		#hipotetic

SFX 829	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 829	0	rebia	.		#imperfecte
SFX 829	0	rebies	.		#imperfecte
SFX 829	0	rebíem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 829	0	rebíeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 829	0	rebien	.		#imperfecte

SFX 830	Y	4	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 830	0	unya/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 830	0	unyam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 830	0	unyau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 830	0	unyen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 831	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 831	0	e	.		#futur
SFX 831	0	às	.		#futur
SFX 831	0	à	.		#futur
SFX 831	0	em	.		#futur
SFX 831	0	eu	.		#futur
SFX 831	0	an	.		#futur

SFX 832	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 832	0	unyga/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 832	0	unygues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 832	0	unygam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 832	0	unygau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 832	0	unyguen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 833	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 833	0	é	.		#futur
SFX 833	0	as	.		#futur
SFX 833	0	à	.		#futur
SFX 833	0	em	.		#futur
SFX 833	0	eu	.		#futur
SFX 833	0	an	.		#futur

SFX 834	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 834	0	rebré	.		#futur
SFX 834	0	rebràs	.		#futur
SFX 834	0	rebrà	.		#futur
SFX 834	0	rebrem	.		#futur
SFX 834	0	rebreu	.		#futur
SFX 834	0	rebran	.		#futur

SFX 835	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 835	0	gea	.		#imperfecte
SFX 835	0	gees	.		#imperfecte
SFX 835	0	géem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 835	0	géeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 835	0	geen	.		#imperfecte

SFX 836	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 836	0	uré	.		#futur
SFX 836	0	uràs	.		#futur
SFX 836	0	urà	.		#futur
SFX 836	0	urem	.		#futur
SFX 836	0	ureu	.		#futur
SFX 836	0	uran	.		#futur

SFX 837	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 837	0	ies	.		#hipotetic
SFX 837	0	ia	.		#hipotetic
SFX 837	0	íem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 837	0	íeu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 837	0	ien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 838	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 838	0	rep/453	.		#present
SFX 838	0	reps/453	.		#present
SFX 838	0	rebem/453	.		#present
SFX 838	0	rebeu/453	.		#present
SFX 838	0	reben/453	.		#present

SFX 839	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 839	0	onyira	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 839	0	onyires	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 839	0	onyírem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 839	0	onyíreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 839	0	onyiren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 840	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 840	0	uny/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 840	0	unyga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 840	0	unygam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 840	0	unygau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 840	0	unguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 841	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 841	0	uria	.		#hipotetic
SFX 841	0	uries	.		#hipotetic
SFX 841	0	uríem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 841	0	uríeu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 841	0	urien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 842	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 842	0	ia	.		#hipotetic
SFX 842	0	ies	.		#hipotetic
SFX 842	0	íem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 842	0	íeu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 842	0	iien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 843	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 843	0	onyia	.		#imperfecte
SFX 843	0	onyies	.		#imperfecte
SFX 843	0	onyíem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 843	0	onyíeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 843	0	onyien	.		#imperfecte

SFX 844	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 844	0	unyc/453	.		#present
SFX 844	0	unys/453	.		#present
SFX 844	0	uny/453	.		#present
SFX 844	0	onyim/453	.		#present
SFX 844	0	onyiu/453	.		#present
SFX 844	0	unyen/453	.		#present

SFX 845	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 845	ànyer	ànyer/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 845	ànyer	any/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 845	ànyer	anya/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 845	ànyer	anygam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 845	ànyer	anygau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 845	ànyer	anyguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 846	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 846	çar	ce/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 846	çar	ces/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 846	çar	ça/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 846	çar	cem/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 846	çar	ceu/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 846	çar	cen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 847	Y	1	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 847	ényer	0/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 848	Y	2	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 848	òure	uic/453	.		#present
SFX 848	òure	òure/453	.		#present

SFX 849	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 849	abre	àpia/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 849	abre	àpies/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 849	abre	apiam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 849	abre	apiau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 849	abre	àpien/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 850	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 850	abre	abre/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 850	abre	ap/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 850	abre	àpia/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 850	abre	apiam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 850	abre	apiau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 850	abre	àpien/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 851	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 851	actar	orsioí	.		#perfecte
SFX 851	actar	orsioares	.		#perfecte
SFX 851	actar	orsioà	.		#perfecte
SFX 851	actar	orsioàrem	.		#perfecte
SFX 851	actar	orsioàreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 851	actar	orsioaren	.		#perfecte

SFX 852	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 852	actar	actar/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 852	actar	orsioa/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 852	actar	orsioe/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 852	actar	orsioem/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 852	actar	orsioeu/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 852	actar	orsioen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 853	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 853	actar	orsioaria	.		#hipotetic
SFX 853	actar	orsioaries	.		#hipotetic
SFX 853	actar	orsioaríem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 853	actar	orsioaríeu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 853	actar	orsioarien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 854	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 854	actar	orsioaré	.		#futur
SFX 854	actar	orsioaràs	.		#futur
SFX 854	actar	orsioarà	.		#futur
SFX 854	actar	orsioarem	.		#futur
SFX 854	actar	orsioareu	.		#futur
SFX 854	actar	orsioaran	.		#futur

SFX 855	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 855	actar	orsioara	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 855	actar	orsioares	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 855	actar	orsioàrem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 855	actar	orsioàreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 855	actar	orsioaren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 856	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 856	actar	orsioava	.		#imperfecte
SFX 856	actar	orsioaves	.		#imperfecte
SFX 856	actar	orsioàvem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 856	actar	orsioàveu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 856	actar	orsioaven	.		#imperfecte

SFX 857	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 857	actar	orsioe/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 857	actar	orsioes/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 857	actar	orsioem/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 857	actar	orsioeu/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 857	actar	orsioen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
