Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.dic
abraçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
acodir/451,455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
acunçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
afiançar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
afusar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
alcançar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
almerçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
amenaçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
apedaçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
apersonar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
arromançar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
arrossinar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
atarroçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
avançar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
avassallar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
borbollejar/455,456,457,458,463,464,465,466,828,1054
caçar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
capçar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
caramelar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
coaccionar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
colegir/455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
complànyer/630,631,632,633,634,635,636,845,1076
confraternisar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
contactar/851,852,853,854,855,856,857,858,1102
corregnar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
denominar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
desamovençar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
desarrugar/455,456,457,458,477,478,479,480,828,1054
descapçar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
desdibuixar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
desenllaçar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
desenllosar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
desgrançar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
desinficionar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
despalluçar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
desperear/455,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,833,878,1054
desplaçar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
despollegar/455,456,457,458,477,478,479,480,828,1054
destarroçar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
dilacerar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
electrocutar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
embardiçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
empalomar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
encanyiçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
enfornar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
enlliçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
enverniçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
equidistar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
escagarruçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,828,846,1054
escorçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
esmunyir/451,814,818,822,823,830,832,839,840,843,844,1121
estopar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
exalçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
flexionar/456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,837,878,1054
follejar/455,456,457,458,463,464,465,466,828,1054
forçar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
immutar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
lladrupejar/455,456,457,458,463,464,465,466,828,1054
malendreçar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
malvestir/456,467,468,469,617,618,619,828,842,1054
moralisar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
patronejar/451,455,456,457,458,463,464,465,466,828,1054
percaçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
plaure/451,481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,821,835,1061
propendir/451,455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
reboçar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
recebir/812,819,820,826,827,829,834,838
refermar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
reforçar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
restrényer/576,577,578,579,580,581,582,583,847,1080
retribuir/455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
sobrealçar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
solapar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
traspalar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
